Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1309.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Issuance of special orders; civil penalties.

The Board shall have the power to issue special orders to:

Such special orders are to be issued only after a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with § 2.2-4020 with reasonable notice to the affected owners of the time, place and purpose thereof, and they shall become effective not less than five days after service as provided in subsection C below. Should the Board find that any such owner is unreasonably affecting the public health, safety or welfare, or the health of animal or plant life, or property, after a reasonable attempt to give notice, it shall declare a state of emergency and may issue without hearing an emergency special order directing the owner to cease such pollution immediately, and shall within 10 days hold a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the owner, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel such emergency special order. If the Board finds that an owner who has been issued a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the terms thereof, it may proceed in accordance with §

10.1-1316

or

10.1-1320

.

Any special order issued under the provisions of this section need not be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, but the owner to whom such special order is directed shall be notified by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known address of such owner, or by personal delivery by an agent of the Board, and the time limits specified shall be counted from the date of receipt.

Nothing in this section or in §

10.1-1307

shall limit the Board’s authority to proceed against such owner directly under §

10.1-1316

or

10.1-1320

without the prior issuance of an order, special or otherwise.

owners who are permitting or causing air pollution as defined by §

10.1-1300

, to cease and desist from such pollution;

owners who have failed to construct facilities in accordance with or have failed to comply with plans for the control of air pollution submitted by them to and approved by the Board, to construct such facilities in accordance with or otherwise comply with, such approved plans;

owners who have violated or failed to comply with the terms and provisions of any Board order or directive to comply with such terms and provisions;

owners who have contravened duly adopted and promulgated air quality standards and policies, to cease such contravention and to comply with air quality standards and policies;

require any owner to comply with the provisions of this chapter and any Board decision; and

require any person to pay civil penalties of up to $32,500 for each violation, not to exceed $100,000 per order, if (a) the person has been issued at least two written notices of alleged violation by the Department for the same or substantially related violations at the same site, (b) such violations have not been resolved by demonstration that there was no violation, by an order issued by the Board or the Director, or by other means, (c) at least 130 days have passed since the issuance of the first notice of alleged violation, and (d) there is a finding that such violations have occurred after a hearing conducted in accordance with subsection B. The actual amount of any penalty assessed shall be based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty. The Board shall provide the person with the calculation for the proposed penalty prior to any hearing conducted for the issuance of an order that assesses penalties pursuant to this subsection. Penalties shall be paid to the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§

10.1-2500

et seq.). The issuance of a notice of alleged violation by the Department shall not be considered a case decision as defined in § 2.2-4001. Any notice of alleged violation shall include a description of each violation, the specific provision of law violated, and information on the process for obtaining a final decision or fact finding from the Department on whether or not a violation has occurred, and nothing in this section shall preclude an owner from seeking such a determination.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.18:1; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891; 2005, c. 706.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 706, cl. 2, provides: “That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop uniform procedures to govern the formal hearings conducted pursuant to this act to ensure they are conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, any policies adopted by the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, or the State Air Pollution Control Board and to ensure that the facility owners and operators have access to information on how such hearings will be conducted. In addition, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop and implement an early dispute resolution process to help identify and resolve disagreements regarding what is required to comply with the regulations promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board and any related guidance. The process shall be available after the issuance of a notice of alleged violation or other notice of deficiency issued by the Department. The early dispute resolution process shall be developed by September 1, 2005, and information on the process shall be provided to the public and to facilities potentially impacted by the provisions of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 706 inserted subdivision A (vi); inserted “before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with § 2.2-4020” in subsection B; made related changes; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board” throughout except in subsection A in clause (vi) in the first, third, and fourth occurrences of “Department”; deleted “the Board or” preceding “the Director” in subsection A, clause (vi), clause (b); and substituted “Department’s” for “Board’s” in subsection D.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 10.1-1309.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Issuance of special orders; civil penalties.

The Department shall have the power to issue special orders to:

Such special orders are to be issued only after a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with § 2.2-4020 with reasonable notice to the affected owners of the time, place and purpose thereof, and they shall become effective not less than five days after service as provided in subsection C below. Should the Department find that any such owner is unreasonably affecting the public health, safety or welfare, or the health of animal or plant life, or property, after a reasonable attempt to give notice, it shall declare a state of emergency and may issue without hearing an emergency special order directing the owner to cease such pollution immediately, and shall within 10 days hold a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the owner, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel such emergency special order. If the Department finds that an owner who has been issued a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the terms thereof, it may proceed in accordance with §

10.1-1316

or

10.1-1320

.

Any special order issued under the provisions of this section need not be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, but the owner to whom such special order is directed shall be notified by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known address of such owner, or by personal delivery by an agent of the Department, and the time limits specified shall be counted from the date of receipt.

Nothing in this section or in §

10.1-1307

shall limit the Department’s authority to proceed against such owner directly under §

10.1-1316

or

10.1-1320

without the prior issuance of an order, special or otherwise.

owners who are permitting or causing air pollution as defined by §

10.1-1300

, to cease and desist from such pollution;

owners who have failed to construct facilities in accordance with or have failed to comply with plans for the control of air pollution submitted by them to and approved by the Department, to construct such facilities in accordance with or otherwise comply with, such approved plans;

owners who have violated or failed to comply with the terms and provisions of any Department order or directive to comply with such terms and provisions;

owners who have contravened duly adopted and promulgated air quality standards and policies, to cease such contravention and to comply with air quality standards and policies;

require any owner to comply with the provisions of this chapter and any Department decision; and

require any person to pay civil penalties of up to $32,500 for each violation, not to exceed $100,000 per order, if (a) the person has been issued at least two written notices of alleged violation by the Department for the same or substantially related violations at the same site, (b) such violations have not been resolved by demonstration that there was no violation, by an order issued by the Director, or by other means, (c) at least 130 days have passed since the issuance of the first notice of alleged violation, and (d) there is a finding that such violations have occurred after a hearing conducted in accordance with subsection B. The actual amount of any penalty assessed shall be based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty. The Department shall provide the person with the calculation for the proposed penalty prior to any hearing conducted for the issuance of an order that assesses penalties pursuant to this subsection. Penalties shall be paid to the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§

10.1-2500

et seq.). The issuance of a notice of alleged violation by the Department shall not be considered a case decision as defined in § 2.2-4001. Any notice of alleged violation shall include a description of each violation, the specific provision of law violated, and information on the process for obtaining a final decision or fact finding from the Department on whether or not a violation has occurred, and nothing in this section shall preclude an owner from seeking such a determination.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.18:1; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891; 2005, c. 706; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1309.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Special orders; penalties.

The Board is authorized to issue special orders in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) requiring that an owner file with the Board a plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial and imminent threat to public health or the environment that is reasonably likely to occur if such source ceases operations. Such plan shall also include a demonstration of financial capability to implement the plan. Financial capability may be demonstrated by the establishment of an escrow account, the creation of a trust fund to be maintained within the Department, submission of a bond, corporate guarantee based on audited financial statements, or such other instruments as the Board may deem appropriate.
The Board may require that such plan and instruments be updated as appropriate. The Board shall give due consideration to any plan submitted by the owner in accordance with §§

10.1-1410

,

10.1-1428

, and 62.1-44.15:1.1, in determining the necessity for and suitability of any plan submitted under this section.

For the purposes of this section, “ceases operation” means to cease conducting the normal operation of a source which is regulated under this chapter under circumstances where it would be reasonable to expect that such operation will not be resumed by the owner at the source.
The term shall not include the sale or transfer of a source in the ordinary course of business or a permit transfer in accordance with Board regulations.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

1991, c. 702.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in the first paragraph, substituted “Department” for “Board” throughout except for the third occurrence of “Department.”

§ 10.1-1309.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Special orders; penalties.

The Department is authorized to issue special orders in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) requiring that an owner file with the Department a plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial and imminent threat to public health or the environment that is reasonably likely to occur if such source ceases operations. Such plan shall also include a demonstration of financial capability to implement the plan. Financial capability may be demonstrated by the establishment of an escrow account, the creation of a trust fund to be maintained within the Department, submission of a bond, corporate guarantee based on audited financial statements, or such other instruments as the Department may deem appropriate. The Department may require that such plan and instruments be updated as appropriate. The Department shall give due consideration to any plan submitted by the owner in accordance with §§

10.1-1410

,

10.1-1428

, and 62.1-44.15:1.1, in determining the necessity for and suitability of any plan submitted under this section.

For the purposes of this section, “ceases operation” means to cease conducting the normal operation of a source which is regulated under this chapter under circumstances where it would be reasonable to expect that such operation will not be resumed by the owner at the source. The term shall not include the sale or transfer of a source in the ordinary course of business or a permit transfer in accordance with Board regulations.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

1991, c. 702; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1310.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Decision of Board pursuant to hearing.

Any decision by the Board rendered pursuant to hearings under §

10.1-1309

shall be reduced to writing and shall contain the explicit findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the Board’s decision is based. Certified copies of the written decision shall be delivered or mailed by certified mail to the parties affected by it. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall render such decision invalid.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.18:2; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board”; and substituted “Department’s” for “Board’s.”

§ 10.1-1310.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Decision of Department pursuant to hearing.

Any decision by the Department rendered pursuant to hearings under §

10.1-1309

shall be reduced to writing and shall contain the explicit findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the Department’s decision is based. Certified copies of the written decision shall be delivered or mailed by certified mail to the parties affected by it. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall render such decision invalid.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.18:2; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1310.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Notification of local government.

Upon determining that there has been a violation of this chapter or any regulation promulgated under this chapter or order of the Board, and such violation poses an imminent threat to the health, safety or welfare of the public, the Director shall immediately notify the chief administrative officer of any potentially affected local government. Neither the Director, the Commonwealth, nor any employee of the Commonwealth shall be liable for a failure to provide, or a delay in providing, the notification required by this section.

History.

1988, cc. 434, 891; 1990, c. 238.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1988, c. 434, as § 10-17.18:4. Pursuant to Acts 1988, c. 891, cl. 5, this section has been incorporated into Title 10.1 as §

10.1-1310.1

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board.”

§ 10.1-1310.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Notification of local government.

Upon determining that there has been a violation of this chapter or any regulation promulgated under this chapter or order of the Department, and such violation poses an imminent threat to the health, safety or welfare of the public, the Director shall immediately notify the chief administrative officer of any potentially affected local government. Neither the Director, the Commonwealth, nor any employee of the Commonwealth shall be liable for a failure to provide, or a delay in providing, the notification required by this section.

History.

1988, cc. 434, 891; 1990, c. 238; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1311.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Penalties for noncompliance; judicial review.

The Board is authorized to promulgate regulations providing for the determination of a formula for the basis of the amount of any noncompliance penalty to be assessed by a court pursuant to subsection B hereof, in conformance with the requirements of Section 120 of the federal Clean Air Act, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder. Any regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Upon a determination of the amount by the Board, the Board shall petition the circuit court of the county or city wherein the owner subject to such noncompliance assessment resides, regularly or systematically conducts affairs or business activities, or where such owner’s property affected by the administrative action is located for an order requiring payment of a noncompliance penalty in a sum the court deems appropriate.

Any order issued by a court pursuant to this section may be enforced as a judgment of the court. All sums collected, less the assessment and collection costs, shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title.

Any penalty assessed under this section shall be in addition to permits, fees, orders, payments, sanctions, or other requirements under this chapter, and shall in no way affect any civil or criminal enforcement proceedings brought under other provisions of this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 65, § 10-17.18:3; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 718.

Editor’s note.

As to § 120 of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to in subsection A above, see 42 U.S.C.S. § 7420.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection B, substituted “Department” for “Board” twice.

§ 10.1-1311.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Penalties for noncompliance; judicial review.

The Board is authorized to promulgate regulations providing for the determination of a formula for the basis of the amount of any noncompliance penalty to be assessed by a court pursuant to subsection B hereof, in conformance with the requirements of § 120 of the federal Clean Air Act, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder. Any regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Upon a determination of the amount by the Department, the Department shall petition the circuit court of the county or city wherein the owner subject to such noncompliance assessment resides, regularly or systematically conducts affairs or business activities, or where such owner’s property affected by the administrative action is located for an order requiring payment of a noncompliance penalty in a sum the court deems appropriate.

Any order issued by a court pursuant to this section may be enforced as a judgment of the court. All sums collected, less the assessment and collection costs, shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title.

Any penalty assessed under this section shall be in addition to permits, fees, orders, payments, sanctions, or other requirements under this chapter, and shall in no way affect any civil or criminal enforcement proceedings brought under other provisions of this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 65, § 10-17.18:3; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 718; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1312.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Air pollution control districts.

The Board may create, within any area of the Commonwealth, local air pollution control districts comprising a city or county or a part or parts of each, or two or more cities or counties, or any combination or parts thereof. Such local districts may be established by the Board on its own motion or upon request of the governing body or bodies of the area involved.

In each district there shall be a local air pollution control committee, the members of which shall be appointed by the Board from lists of recommended nominees submitted by the respective governing bodies of each locality, all or a portion of which are included in the district. The number of members on each committee shall be in the discretion of the Board. When a district includes two or more localities or portions thereof, the Board shall apportion the membership of the committee among the localities, provided that each locality shall have at least one representative on the committee. The members shall not be compensated out of state funds, but may be reimbursed for expenses out of state funds. Localities may provide for the payment of compensation and reimbursement of expenses to the members and may appropriate funds therefore. The portion of such payment to be borne by each locality shall be prescribed by agreement.

The local committee is empowered to observe compliance with the regulations of the Board and report instances of noncompliance to the Board, to conduct educational programs relating to air pollution and its effects, to assist the Department in its air monitoring programs, to initiate and make studies relating to air pollution and its effects, and to make recommendations to the Board.

The governing body of any locality, wholly or partially included within any such district, may appropriate funds for use by the local committee in air pollution control and studies.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.19; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1972, c. 781; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board” throughout except for the second occurrence of “Department” in subsection C.

§ 10.1-1312.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Air pollution control districts.

The Department may create, within any area of the Commonwealth, local air pollution control districts comprising a city or county or a part or parts of each, or two or more cities or counties, or any combination or parts thereof. Such local districts may be established by the Department on its own motion or upon request of the governing body or bodies of the area involved.

In each district there shall be a local air pollution control committee, the members of which shall be appointed by the Department from lists of recommended nominees submitted by the respective governing bodies of each locality, all or a portion of which are included in the district. The number of members on each committee shall be in the discretion of the Department. When a district includes two or more localities or portions thereof, the Department shall apportion the membership of the committee among the localities, provided that each locality shall have at least one representative on the committee. The members shall not be compensated out of state funds, but may be reimbursed for expenses out of state funds. Localities may provide for the payment of compensation and reimbursement of expenses to the members and may appropriate funds therefore. The portion of such payment to be borne by each locality shall be prescribed by agreement.

The local committee is empowered to observe compliance with the regulations of the Board and report instances of noncompliance to the Department, to conduct educational programs relating to air pollution and its effects, to assist the Department in its air monitoring programs, to initiate and make studies relating to air pollution and its effects, and to make recommendations to the Department.

The governing body of any locality, wholly or partially included within any such district, may appropriate funds for use by the local committee in air pollution control and studies.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.19; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1972, c. 781; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1313.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) State Advisory Board on Air Pollution.

The Board is authorized to name qualified persons to a State Advisory Board on Air Pollution.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.20; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board.”

§ 10.1-1313.
(Effective July 1, 2022) State Advisory Board on Air Pollution.

The Department is authorized to name qualified persons to a State Advisory Board on Air Pollution.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.20; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1314.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Owners to furnish plans, specifications and information.

Every owner which the Board has reason to believe is causing, or may be about to cause, an air pollution problem shall on request of the Board furnish such plans, specifications and information as may be required by the Board in the discharge of its duties under this chapter. Any information, except emission data, as to secret processes, formulae or methods of manufacture or production shall not be disclosed in public hearing and shall be kept confidential. If samples are taken for analysis, a duplicate of the analytical report shall be furnished promptly to the person from whom such sample is requested.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.21; 1968, c. 311; 1975, c. 126; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board” throughout.

§ 10.1-1314.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Owners to furnish plans, specifications and information.

Every owner which the Department has reason to believe is causing, or may be about to cause, an air pollution problem shall on request of the Department furnish such plans, specifications and information as may be required by the Department in the discharge of its duties under this chapter. Any information, except emission data, as to secret processes, formulae or methods of manufacture or production shall not be disclosed in public hearing and shall be kept confidential. If samples are taken for analysis, a duplicate of the analytical report shall be furnished promptly to the person from whom such sample is requested.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.21; 1968, c. 311; 1975, c. 126; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1314.1.
Protection of trade secrets.

Any information, except emissions data, reported to or otherwise obtained by the Director, the Board, or the agents or employees of either which contains or might reveal a trade secret shall be confidential and shall be limited to those persons who need such information for purposes of enforcement of this chapter or the federal Clean Air Act or regulations and orders of the Board. It shall be the duty of each owner to notify the Director or his representatives of the existence of trade secrets when he desires the protection provided herein.

History.

1990, c. 238.

§ 10.1-1315.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Right of entry.

Whenever it is necessary for the purposes of this chapter, the Board or any member, agent or employee thereof, when duly authorized by the Board, may at reasonable times enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, to obtain information or conduct surveys or investigations.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.22; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for the first occurrence of “Board”; deleted “member” preceding “agent”; substituted “Director” for the second occurrence of “Board”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 10.1-1315.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Right of entry.

Whenever it is necessary for the purposes of this chapter, the Department or any agent or employee thereof, when duly authorized by the Director, may at reasonable times enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, to obtain information or conduct surveys or investigations.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.22; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1316.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Enforcement and civil penalties.

Any owner violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any provision of this chapter, any Board regulation or order, or any permit condition may be compelled to comply by injunction, mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained under subsection A, any owner violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any Board regulation or order, any provision of this chapter, or any permit condition shall be subject, in the discretion of the court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $32,500 for each violation. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of any civil penalty to be assessed pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider, in addition to such other factors as it may deem appropriate, the size of the owner’s business, the severity of the economic impact of the penalty on the business, and the seriousness of the violation. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title. Such civil penalties may, in the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city or town in which the violation occurred, to be used to abate environmental pollution in such manner as the court may, by order, direct, except that where the owner in violation is the county, city or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

With the consent of an owner who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any Board regulation or order, or any provision of this chapter, or any permit condition, the Board may provide, in any order issued by the Board against the owner, for the payment of civil charges in specific sums, not to exceed the limit of subsection B. Such civil charges shall be in lieu of any civil penalty which could be imposed under subsection B. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

The Board shall develop and provide an opportunity for public comment on guidelines and procedures that contain specific criteria for calculating the appropriate penalty for each violation based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.23; 1976, c. 622; 1978, c. 475; 1980, c. 378; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 718; 1993, c. 13; 2005, c. 706.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 706 substituted “$32,500” for “$25,000”; and added subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 inserted “Department” following “Board regulation or” throughout; and in subsections C and D, and substituted “the Department” or variant for “the Board” or variant.

§ 10.1-1316.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Enforcement and civil penalties.

Any owner violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any provision of this chapter, any Board regulation or Department order, or any permit condition may be compelled to comply by injunction, mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained under subsection A, any owner violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any Board regulation or Department order, any provision of this chapter, or any permit condition shall be subject, in the discretion of the court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $32,500 for each violation. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of any civil penalty to be assessed pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider, in addition to such other factors as it may deem appropriate, the size of the owner’s business, the severity of the economic impact of the penalty on the business, and the seriousness of the violation. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title. Such civil penalties may, in the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city or town in which the violation occurred, to be used to abate environmental pollution in such manner as the court may, by order, direct, except that where the owner in violation is the county, city or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

With the consent of an owner who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any Board regulation or Department order, or any provision of this chapter, or any permit condition, the Department may provide, in any order issued by the Department against the owner, for the payment of civil charges in specific sums, not to exceed the limit of subsection B. Such civil charges shall be in lieu of any civil penalty which could be imposed under subsection B. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

The Department shall develop and provide an opportunity for public comment on guidelines and procedures that contain specific criteria for calculating the appropriate penalty for each violation based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.23; 1976, c. 622; 1978, c. 475; 1980, c. 378; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 718; 1993, c. 13; 2005, c. 706; 2022, c. 356.